src-fst-root.lexc.md
Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for North Sámi.

# North Sámi morphological analyser

# Multicharacter symbols

## Tags for POS

* **+N** - Noun
* **+A** - Adjective
* **+Adv** - Adverb
* **+V** - Verb
* **+Pron** - Pronoun
* **+CS** - Subjunction
* **+CC** - Conjunction
* **+Adp** - Adposition, ie Post- and Prepostion, NOT IN USE
* **+Po** - Postpostion
* **+Pr** - Preposition
* **+Interj** - Interjection
* **+Pcle** - Particle
* **+Num** - Numeral

## Tags for sub-POS
* **+Prop** - Propernoun
* **+Pers** - Personal Pronoun
* **+Dem** - Demonstrative Pronoun
* **+Interr** - Interrogative Pronoun
* **+Refl** - Reflexive Pronoun
* **+Recipr** - Reciprocal Pronoun
* **+Rel** - Relative Pronoun
* **+Indef** - Indefinitive Pronoun
* **+Coll** - Collective numerals, subtag for +N
* **+Arab** - Arabic numeral, subtag for +Num
* **+Rom** - Roman numeral, subtag for +Num
* **+Pass** - hallat/haddat not in use
* **+Known** - man (different from maid): mii+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc+Known

# Tags for Inflection

## Tags for Case and Number Inflection
* **+Sg** - Singular
* **+Du** - Dual
* **+Pl** - Plural

* **+Ess** - Essive
* **+Nom** - Nominative
* **+Gen** - Genitive
* **+Acc** - Accusative
* **+Ill** - Illative
* **+Loc** - Locative = Inessive and Ellative
* **+Com** - Comitative
* **+Com/Sh** - Comitative Plural Hyphened Shortform (w/o -guin), ie Beatnagii-, Biillai-, Bohccui- etc.

## Possessive tags

* **+PxSg1**    Singular First Person
* **+PxSg2**    Singular Second Person
* **+PxSg3**    Singular Third Person
* **+PxDu1**    Dual First Person
* **+PxDu2**    Dual Second Person
* **+PxDu3**    Dual Third Person
* **+PxPl1**    Plural First Person
* **+PxPl2**    Plural Second Person
* **+PxPl3**    Plural Third Person

## Adjectival tags
* **+Attr**   Attributive
* **+Card**   Cardinal Number Not in use
* **+Ord**   Ordinal Number

## Moods
* **+Ind** Indicative
* **+Pot** Potential
* **+Cond** Conditional
* **+Imprt** Imperative

## Tenses
* **+Prs** Present Tense
* **+Prt** Past Tense, Preterite

## Verb person-number

* **+Sg1** Singular First Person
* **+Sg2** Singular Second Person
* **+Sg3** Singular Third Person
* **+Du1** Dual First Person
* **+Du2** Dual Second Person
* **+Du3** Dual Third Person
* **+Pl1** Plural First Person
* **+Pl2** Plural Second Person
* **+Pl3** Plural Third Person

## Infinite verb forms

* **+Inf** Infinitive
* **+Ger** Gerund
* **+ConNeg** Negation Form, ie Mana, Doalvvo, Juoge etc
* **+ConNegII** Alternative, Rather Declamatory Negation Form - Infrequent
* **+Neg** Negation Verb, Ii and its forms, ie Ale, Alli, Allot, Ehpet, Eat etc.
* **+ImprtII** Alternative, Rather Declamatory Imperative Form - Infrequent not in use
* **+PrsPrc** Present Participe
* **+PrfPrc** Perfect Participe
* **+Sup** Supine
* **+VGen** VerbGenitive
* **+VAbess** VerbAbbesive
* **+Actio** Action Verb Form

## Other tags
* **+Gram/Comp**   Comparative, adverbs
* **+Gram/Superl**   Superlative, adverbs

* **+ABBR** Abbreviation, subtag for e.g. +N
* **+Symbol** = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
* **+ACR**  Acronym, subtag for +N
* **+CLB**  Clause border (full stop, comma..)
* **+PUNCT**  punctuation
* **+LEFT**  left paranthesis
* **+RIGHT**  right paranthesis
* **+Dyn**  Dynamically generated (acronyms) +ACR+Dyn
* **+CLBfinal**  Sentence final abbreviated expression ending in full stop, so that the full stop is ambiguous

* **+TV**    Transitive Verb, +V+TV
* **+IV** Intransitive Verb, +V+IV
* **+G3** Grade 2-3 for homonymies with grade 1-2, +N+G3
* **+G7** Grade 3, no consonant gradation, +N+G7
* **+NomAg** Actor Noun From Verb - Nomen Agentis, +N+NomAg

* **+Gram/TAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviation (it needs an argument)
* **+Gram/NoAbbr**:  Intransitive abbreviations that are homonymous
with more frequent words. They should only be considered
abbreviations in the middle of a sentence.
* **+Gram/TNumAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviation if the following
constituent is numeric
* **+Gram/NumNoAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviations for which numerals
are complements and normal words. The abbreviation usage
is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
the sentence can be considered as true cases.
* **+Gram/TIAbbr**:  Both transitive and intransitive abbreviation
* **+Gram/IAbbr**:  Intransitive abbreviation (it takes no argument)
* **+Gram/3syll**: trisyllabic verbs

## Question and Focus particles:
* **+Qst**   Question Particle: +Pcle+Qst
* **+Subqst**   Embedded Question Particle: +Adv+Subqst
* **+Foc/naj**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/Neg-ge**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/Pos-ge**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/gen**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/ges**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/gis**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/ba**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/be**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/hal**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/han**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/bai**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/bas**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/bat**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/ban**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/son**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/bahal**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/behal**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/bahan**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/behan**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/bason**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/beson**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/mat**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/mis**	Focus clitic
* **+Foc/s**	Focus clitic

## Tags distinguishing different versions of the same lemma (before POS)
* +v1
* +v2
* +v3
* +v4
* +v5
* +v6
* +v7
* +v8
* +v9
* +v10
* +v11
* +v12
* +v13
* +v14
* +v15
* +v16
* +v17
* +v18
* +v19
* +v20
* +v21
* +v22
* +v23
* +v24

Note: These high +v... number are in use for one word only:
doavttergrádakursa

## Escaped chars

* ** %        **
* **+Guess** for the name guesser
* ** +MWE     ** - Multi-word expressions treated as such in the preprocessor. To be added as first tag after the lemma

* **+PxCPlComRecipr** used in pronoun-sme-morph.txt

## Error (non-standard language) tags

* **+Err/Orth** substandard, not in normative fst
* **+Err/Orth-a-á** substandard, not in normative fst
* **+Err/Orth-nom-gen** substandard, not in normative fst
* **+Err/Orth-nom-acc** substandard, not in normative fst
* **+Err/Lex** substandard, not in normative fst, no normative lemma
* **+Err/DerSub** substandard for derivation, not in normative fst, no normative lemma
* **+Err/CmpSub** substandard for compounding, not in normative fst (wrong form or POS in first part)
* **+Err/MissingSpace** indicates that there is a missing space, causing an orthographic error
* **+Err/MissingHyph** when there is no hyphen where it should have been
* **+Err/Hyph** when there is a hyphen where none should have been
* **+Err/SpaceCmp** used for compounds written apart - only retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Err/Spellrelax** used to tag spellrelaxed typos (tag is inserted via flag diacritics)
* **+Err/Confused** grammarcheking rela word error confusion pairs
* **+Err/Confused-Ess** grammarcheking rela word error confusion pairs
* **+Err/Confused-ASgNom** grammarcheking rela word error confusion pairs
* **+Err/Confused-DerPassPrsSg3** grammarcheking rela word error confusion pairs
* **+Err/Confused-NSgPxSg1** grammarcheking rela word error confusion pairs
* **+Err/Confused-NomAgIll** grammarcheking rela word error confusion pairs
* **+Err/Confused-ImprtDu1** grammarcheking rela word error confusion pairs
* **+Err/Confused-DerPassPrtSg3** grammarcheking rela word error confusion pairs
* **+Err/Confused-ImprtSg2** grammarcheking rela word error confusion pairs
* **+Err/Confused-ImprtPl2** grammarcheking rela word error confusion pairs

## Usage tags

* **+Use/-Spell** Orthographically correct, typically perifer words, excluded in speller because they cause trouble for frequent words
* **+Use/-PLX** Excluded in PLX-speller
* **+Use/SpellNoSugg** recognized but not suggested in speller
* **+Use/Circ** circular paths (old ^C^)
* **+Use/CircN** circular paths for the numerals (old ^N^)
* **+Use/MT** Generate for MT only, for restricting analyses needed
for MT generation not to pop up elsewhere (NOT IN FUNCTION)
* **+Use/LIA** only for LIA-analyser
* **+Use/NG** not-generate, for ped generation isme-ped.fst and MT
* **+Use/NGminip** Not for miniparadigm in NDS dicts
* **+Use/PMatch** means that the following is only used in the analyser feeding the disambiguator
* **+Use/-PMatch** Do not include in fst's made for hfst-pmatch
* **+Use/GC** – **only** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/-GC** – **never** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+MWESplit** Split point for MWE

## Dialect tags:

* **+Dial/-KJ** forms not in use in KJ (Kárásjohka)
* **+Dial/-GG** forms not in use in GG (Guovdageaidnu)
* **+Dial/-GS** forms not in use in GS (Gárasavvon) NOT IN USE
* **+South** foreløpig lagt til Sg Loc -n, som er en sub-form

## Tags for indicating the orthography used
+Orth/Strd - Standard orthography
+Orth/IPA - IPA transcription

The above should either be used in pairs, or not at all. That is, if a word
doesn't need an IPA stem (because the word in all its inflection can be
converted to IPA by the standard IPA conversion rules), then none of these
tags should be used.
On the other hand, if the word has a spelling that doesn't follow the
orthographic rules, and thus needs an exceptional IPA stem to get it right,
then the exceptional stem must be marked with the `+Orth/IPA`, and the
regular orthography stem must be marked with the tag `+Orth/Strd`. This is
so that we can exclude the one or the other from different fst's, but only
when the oposite stem variant is present.

## Multichars for marking start and end of IPA sequences

<!-- {% raw %} -->
* `%{%<ipa#%}` - ipa text to the left
* `%{#ipa%>%}` - ipa text to the right
* `%<sent%>` - apertium
<!-- {% endraw %} -->

## Compounding tags

The tags are of the following form:
* **+CmpNP/xxx** - Normative (N), Position (P), ie the tag describes what
position the tagged word can be in in a compound
* **+CmpN/xxx**  - Normative (N) **form** ie the tag describes what
form the tagged word should use when making compounds
* **+Cmp/xxx**   - Descriptive compounding tags, ie tags that *describes*
what form a word actually is using in a compound

This entry / word should be in the following position(s):

* **+CmpNP/All** - ... in all positions, **default**, this tag does not have to be written
* **+CmpNP/First** - ... only be first part in a compound or alone
* **+CmpNP/Pref** - ... only **first** part in a compound, NEVER alone
* **+CmpNP/Last** - ... only be last part in a compound or alone
* **+CmpNP/Suff** - ... only **last** part in a compound, NEVER alone
* **+CmpNP/None** - ... does not take part in compounds
* **+CmpNP/Only** - ... only be part of a compound, i.e. can never
be used alone, but can appear in any position

If unmarked, any position goes.

The tagged part of the compound should make a compound using:

* **+CmpN/SgN** Singular Nominative
* **+CmpN/SgG** Singular Genitive
* **+CmpN/PlG** Plural Genitive
* **+CmpN/PlN** Plural Nominative, propers!

Unmarked = Default, ie `+CmpN/SgN` for SME.

The second part of the compound may require that the previous (left part) is:

* **+CmpN/SgNomLeft** Singular Nominative
* **+CmpN/SgGenLeft** Singular Genitive
* **+CmpN/PlGenLeft** Plural Genitive

Tags for descriptive compound analysis - this is what a compound actually is:
